Hawaii statutes.
§674-19 Limitation on actions. Every
claim cognizable under this part shall forever be barred unless the action is
commenced by December 31, 1999. [L 1991, c 323, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 351,
§12; am L Sp 1995, c 14, §15; am L 1997, c 382, §7]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next